Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Chapter 50. Public Official Financial Disclosure.
Sec. 39.50.200.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“assistant to the governor or the lieutenant governor” includes any executive, legislative, special, administrative, or press assistant to the governor or lieutenant governor, and any person similarly employed in a policy-making position;

“child” includes a biological child, an adopted child, and a stepchild;

“commission” means the Alaska Public Offices Commission created under AS

15.13.020(a)

;

“domestic partner” means a person who is cohabiting with another person in a relationship that is like a marriage but that is not a legal marriage;

“instrumentality of the state” means a state department or agency, whether in the legislative, judicial, or executive branch, including the University of Alaska;

“judicial officer” means a person appointed as a justice to the supreme court or as a judge to the court of appeals, superior court, district court, or magistrate court;

“mother or father” includes a biological parent, an adoptive parent, and a stepparent;

“municipal officer” includes a borough or city mayor, borough assemblyman, city councilman, school board member, elected utility board member, city or borough manager, members of a city or borough planning or zoning commission within a home rule or general law city or borough, or a unified municipality;

“public official” means

a judicial officer;

the governor or the lieutenant governor;

a person hired or appointed in a department in the executive branch as

the head or deputy head of the department;

the director or deputy director of a division;

a special assistant to the head of the department;

a person serving as the legislative liaison for the department;

an assistant to the governor or the lieutenant governor;

the chair or a member of a state commission or board;

state investment officers and the state comptroller in the Department of Revenue;

the chief procurement officer appointed under AS

36.30.010

;

the executive director of the Alaska Workforce Investment Board;

each appointed or elected municipal officer; and

the members of the board of trustees, the executive director, and the investment officers of the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation;

“source of income” means the entity for which service is performed or that is otherwise the origin of payment; if the person whose income is being reported is employed by another, the employer is the source of income; but if the person is self-employed by means of a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, professional corporation, or a corporation in which the person, the person’s spouse or domestic partner, or the person’s dependent children, or a combination of them, hold a controlling interest, the “source” is the client or customer of the proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, but, if the entity that is the origin of payment is not the same as the client or customer for whom the service is performed, both are considered the source.

In this chapter “state commission or board” means the

[Repealed, § 30 ch 81 SLA 2000.]

Alaska State Council on the Arts (AS

44.27.040

);

Alcoholic Beverage Control Board (AS

04.06.010

);

State Assessment Review Board (AS

43.56.040

);

[Repealed, § 1 ch 54 SLA 1981.]

Board of Education and Early Development (AS

14.07.075

);

Alaska Public Broadcasting Commission (AS

44.21.256

);

Alaska Public Offices Commission (AS

15.13.020

);

[Repealed, § 16 ch 61 SLA 1995.]

Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission (AS

16.43.020

);

Fishermen’s Fund Advisory and Appeals Council (AS

23.35.010

);

[Repealed, § 140 ch 4 FSSLA 1992.]

State Commission for Human Rights (AS

18.80.010

);

[Repealed, § 86 ch 59 SLA 1982.]

Alaska Judicial Council (art. IV, § 8, Alaska Constitution);

Commission on Judicial Conduct (art. IV, § 10, Alaska Constitution);

[Repealed, § 24 ch 22 SLA 2001.]

Local Boundary Commission (AS

44.33.810

);

Occupational Safety and Health Review Board (AS

18.60.057

);

Board of Parole (AS

33.16.020

);

State Personnel Board (AS

39.25.060

);

[Repealed, § 20 ch 110 SLA 1981.]

[Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

Regulatory Commission of Alaska (AS

42.04.010

);

University of Alaska Board of Regents (AS

14.40.120

);

Alaska Royalty Oil and Gas Development Advisory Board (AS

38.06.020

);

, (28) [Repealed, § 86 ch 59 SLA 1982.]

(29)

[Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

(30)

[Repealed, 1983 Initiative Proposal No. 2, § 6.]

(31)

Workers’ Compensation Board (AS

23.30.005

) and Workers’ Compensation Appeals Commission (AS

23.30.007

);

(32)

Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education (AS

14.42.015

);

(33)

Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority (AS

44.85.020

);

(34)

[Repealed, § 1 ch 54 SLA 1981.]

(35)

Alaska Medical Facility Authority (AS 18.26);

(36)

Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission (AS 31.05);

(37)

Alaska Housing Finance Corporation (AS

18.56.010

—

18.56.900

);

(38)

[Repealed, § 44 ch 24 SLA 2003.]

(39)

[Repealed, § 4 ch 75 SLA 1979.]

(40)

Board of Fisheries (AS

16.05.221(a)

);

(41)

Board of Game (AS

16.05.221(b)

);

(42)

Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation (AS

37.13.040

);

(43)

[Repealed, § 69 ch 14 SLA 1987.]

(44)

Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute (AS

16.51.010

);

(45)

Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault (AS

18.66.010

);

(46)

[Repealed, § 27 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

(47)

[Repealed, § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990.]

(48)

[Repealed, § 16 ch 33 SLA 1996.]

(49)

[Repealed, § 10 ch 29 SLA 1999.]

(50)

[Repealed, § 9 E.O. No. 84 (1993).]

(51)

[Repealed, § 102 ch 21 SLA 2000.]

(52)

[Repealed, § 10 ch 58 SLA 2006.]

(53)

the board of directors and the executive director of the Alaska Aerospace Corporation (AS

26.27.010

);

(54)

Alaska Retirement Management Board (AS

37.10.210

);

(55)

Alaska Workforce Investment Board (AS

23.15.550

);

(56)

Board of Agriculture and Conservation (AS

03.09.010

);

(57)

[Repealed, 2013 SLA ch. 11 § 23.]

(58)

Big Game Commercial Services Board (AS

08.54.591

);

(59)

Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority (AS 44.88);

(60)

the board of directors of the Knik Arm Bridge and Toll Authority (AS

19.75.031

and

19.75.041

);

(61)

Alaska labor relations agency (AS

23.05.360

—

23.05.390

);

(62)

the Board of Trustees of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority (AS

47.30.016

);

(63)

the board of directors of the Alaska Railroad Corporation (AS

42.40.020

—

42.40.060

);

(64)

the board of directors of the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation or the board of directors of a subsidiary of the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation.

History.

(am E.O. No. 44 § 2 (1980); am E.O. No. 84 § 9 (1993); am E.O. No. 106 § 3 (2003); am E.O. No. 115 § 3 (2011); 1974 Initiative Proposal No. 2, § 1; am §§ 18, 19 ch 25 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 79 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 170 SLA 1975; am §
18 ch 263 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 67 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 141 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 158 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 167 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 66 SLA 1979; am §§ 3, 4 ch 75 SLA 1979; am § 37 ch 3 SLA 1980; am § 28 ch 12 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 18 SLA 1980; am §§ 39 — 43 ch 94 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 148 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 101 SLA 1981; am § 5 ch 106 SLA 1981; am § 20 ch 110 SLA 1981; am § 86 ch 59 SLA 1982; am 1983 Initiative Proposal No. 2, § 6; am § 107 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1984; am § 63 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 26 ch 71 SLA 1986; am § 69 ch 14 SLA 1987; am §§ 3, 4 ch 78 SLA 1988; am § 10 ch 37 SLA 1989; am §§ 12, 17 ch 16 SLA 1990; am § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 190 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 77 SLA 1991; am § 11 ch 88 SLA 1991; am §§ 117, 140 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 21 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 47 SLA 1992; am § 41 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 26 ch 134 SLA 1992; am §§ 27, 28 ch 18 SLA 1993; am §§ 4, 16 ch 61 SLA 1995; am § 16 ch 33 SLA 1996; am §§ 76 — 79 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 25 SLA 1999; am § 10 ch 29 SLA 1999; am §§ 45, 46 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 102 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 56 ch 68 SLA 2000; am §§ 29, 30 ch 81 SLA 2000; am § 24 ch 22 SLA 2001; am § 4 2002 Ballot Measure No. 3; am §§ 43, 44 ch 86 SLA 2002; am § 44 ch 24 SLA 2003; am §§ 39 — 41 ch 108 SLA 2003; am §§ 126, 127, 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 71 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am § 40 ch 84 SLA 2005; am §§ 33, 34 ch 12 SLA 2006; am § 10 ch 58 SLA 2006; am §§ 61, 62 ch 47 SLA 2007; am §§ 15, 23 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 18 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (a) was reorganized in 1984 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Paragraph (b)(53) was enacted as (b)(52).
Renumbered in 1991.

In 2000, in paragraph (b)(6), “Board of Education and Early Development” was substituted for “Board of Education” in accordance with sec. 104, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Paragraph (4) was enacted as paragraph (11) and renumbered in 2003, at which time former paragraph (10) was repealed and paragraphs (4) - (9) were renumbered as (5) - (10).

In 2009, under § 2, ch. 60, SLA 2009, in (b) of this section “Alaska Aerospace Corporation” was substituted for “Alaska Aerospace Development Corporation”.

Executive Order 115, sec. 3 purported to amend AS 39.50.200(a)(53), but the text set forth was that of AS 39.50.200(b)(53).
The amendment has been implemented in AS 39.50.200(b)(53).

Administrative Code. —

For public official financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 1.

For legislative financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 1, 2011, substituted “(AS

26.27.010

)” for “(AS

14.40.821

)” in (b)(53).

The 2013 amendment, effective May 22, 2013, repealed (b)(57); added (b)(64).

The 2014 amendment, effective April 23, 2014, in (a)(2), substituted “an adopted child” for “an adoptive child”.